Utah statutes.
53A-5-103.   Payment of dues -- Expenses in attending meetings --
Contributions.
(1)  Member boards may pay dues and make other contributions to the
association for its educational activities.
(2)  They may also incur reasonable travel and subsistence expenses for the
purpose of attending meetings and conferences of the association.
(3)  Dues and contributions expenses shall be paid in the same manner as are
other expenses of the member boards.
